District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-412

Applicability of personal property tax provisions.

Repealed.

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 119, ch. 218, title XVI, § 1601
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(d), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-412.
1973 Ed., § 47-312.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (oo), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”